Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2097
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-2097 to 71-20,101:

(1) Civil penalty includes any remedy required under federal law and includes the imposition of a civil money penalty;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Federal regulations for participation in the medicaid program means the regulations found in 42 C.F.R. parts 442 and 483, as amended, for participation in the medicaid program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended; and

(4) Nursing facility means any intermediate care facility or nursing facility, as defined in sections 71-420 and 71-424, which receives federal and state funds under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 72;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 180;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 103;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 523;

Laws 2019, LB22, § 1.